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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for2UZ -FE)

DIAUY-01

DTC

P 1782 T|F L4 Range position Switch Performance

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The Engine and ECT ECU detects the signal from the transfer L4 position switch.
This DTC indicates that the transfer L4 position switch remains ON.

(a) Output shaft speed 3000 rpm or less

(b) Transfer shift range is H

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Transfer L4 position switch remains ON while vehicle running
under conditionsfor 18secondsormore( 1-tripdetectionlog{ e Shortintransfer L4 position switch circuit
P1782 ic) * Transfer L4 position switch

*Engineand ECTECU
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transfer L4 position switch.

PREPARATION:

Remove the transfer L4 position switch.

CHECK:

Check the continuity between the switch terminals when push-
ing the ball at the tip of the switch.

OK:

27+ 0.82mm

Switch Specified condition
OFF-ON
Push Continuity
D0266s Free No continuity

NG> Replace transfer L4 position switch.

@

2 [ Check harness and connector between battery and transfer L4 position switch,
transfer L4 position switch and Engine and ECT ECU (See page IN-38).

@

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-38).

NG> Repair or replace the harness or connector.
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